Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6804
Genetic sequencing data; storage; access; acts prohibited.

(1) Any genetic sequencing data that is utilized in the State of Nebraska shall not be stored within any foreign adversary country.

(2) No person shall remotely access genetic sequencing data that is stored in the State of Nebraska from a foreign adversary country.

Laws 2025, LB644, § 35.